Utah statutes.
56-1-30.   First-aid kits -- Duty of railroads to comply -- Inspection by
commission.
It shall be the duty of all persons engaged in the operation of railroads to
comply with any regulation or order of the commission issued under the
provisions of this act, and to furnish any information required by the
commission for purposes of this act. The commission or its authorized agent
may, during reasonable hours, enter the place of operation of any person
engaged in the operation of railroads for the purpose of ascertaining whether
the standards prescribed by authority of this act are being complied with.
